Florida, session 2026, HB261.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
27
28 Section 1. Section 627.4635, Florida Statutes, is created
29 to read:
30 627.4635 Restrictions on employer-owned life insurance
31 policies.—
32 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
33 (a) "Employer-owned life insurance" means a life insurance
34 policy owned by, or payable to, an employer on the life of a
35 current or former employee. The term also includes company-owned
36 life insurance or corporate-owned life insurance, a life
37 insurance policy owned by, or payable, to a company or
38 corporation, rather than an individual, on the life of a current
39 or former employee.
40 (b) "Key person" means an owner, senior executive,
41 director, officer, partner, or manager of a business entity,
42 organization, company, or corporation whose death would cause
43 direct, material financial harm to the business entity,
44 organization, company, or corporation.
45 (c) "Rank-and-file employee" means any employee who is not
46 a key person.
47 (2) EMPLOYER-OWNED LIFE INSURANCE POLICIES COVERING KEY
48 PERSONS.—
49 (a) An employer may purchase, maintain, or be a
50 beneficiary of an employer-owned life insurance policy covering
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 261 2026
51 a key person only if all the following conditions are met:
52 1. The employer has obtained the key person's informed,
53 written, and revocable consent before purchasing the policy.
54 2. The employer has provided written notice of the policy
55 to the key person's spouse, next of kin, or estate
56 representative within 30 days after issuance of the policy.
57 3. The employer does not maintain more than five key
58 person policies at any one time without prior approval of the
59 office. The five key persons must be the five highest ranking
60 persons in the employer's business, organization, company, or
61 corporation, based on their seniority, salaries, and benefits.
62 4. The death benefit of any key person's policy does not
63 exceed five times that key person's average annual compensation
64 for the 3 years immediately preceding issuance.
65 5. Upon the key person's termination of employment, the
66 employer either cancels the policy or, with the key person's
67 written consent, transfers ownership to the key person or his or
68 her family.
69 (b)1. If an employer-owner life insurance policy is issued
70 before July 1, 2026, and all the conditions in paragraph (a) are
71 met, the employer must, by January 1, 2027, provide to the key
72 person whose life is covered by the employer-owner life
73 insurance policy the standard form described in subsection (7),
74 which informs the key person that the policy does not benefit
75 the key person, but fully benefits the employer, and that the
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 261 2026
76 key person has the option to opt out of the policy.
77 2. If an employer-owner life insurance policy is issued on
78 or after July 1, 2026, and before October 1, 2026, the employer
79 must, before purchasing the policy, inform the key person whose
80 life is covered by the employer-owner life insurance policy that
81 the policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits
82 the employer, and that the key person has the option to reject
83 the policy.
84 3. If an employer-owner life insurance policy is issued on
85 or after October 1, 2026, the employer must, before purchasing
86 the policy, provide to the key person the standard form
87 described in subsection (7), which informs the key person that
88 the policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits
89 the employer, and that the key person has the option to reject
90 the policy.
91 (3) CERTAIN EMPLOYER-OWNED LIFE INSURANCE POLICIES
92 PROHIBITED.—
93 (a) Except as provided in paragraph (7)(b), an employer
94 may not purchase, maintain, or be a beneficiary of an employer-
95 owned life insurance policy if the policy covers a rank-and-file
96 employee or if any of the conditions described in subsection (2)
97 are not met.
98 (b) Any insurance policy purchased or maintained in
99 violation of paragraph (a) is void as against public policy.
100 (4) NOTICES; REGISTRY AND REPORTING.—
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 261 2026
101 (a) Each insurer issuing an employer-owned life insurance
102 policy shall file notice with the office. The notice must
103 include the employer's name, the number of employees insured,
104 and the aggregate face value of the policies.
105 (b) The office shall maintain a publicly searchable online
106 registry of the filings under paragraph (a) and shall publish an
107 annual report of such filings.
108 (c) An employer that purchases, maintains, or is a
109 beneficiary of an employer-owned life insurance policy shall
110 inform all key persons and shall publicly disclose, such as
111 through publication on the employer's publicly available
112 Internet website, that the employer has met all the requirements
113 of this section.
114 (5) TAX TREATMENT.—
115 (a) Premiums, loan interest, or related expenses for
116 employer-owned life insurance are not deductible under the law
117 of this state.
118 (b) Any death benefit received by an employer under an
119 employer-owned life insurance policy is subject to corporate
120 income tax unless paid directly to the employee's estate or
121 family.
122 (6) ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES.—
123 (a) An employer that violates this section is liable for
124 civil penalties up to five times the death benefit collected.
125 (b) An employee's family has a private right of action to
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 261 2026
126 recover the full value of any benefit collected in violation of
127 this section.
128 (c) An insurer that knowingly issues or administers a
129 policy in violation of this section is subject to an
130 administrative fine of up to $1 million per violation and may
131 have its authority to transact insurance in this state suspended
132 or revoked.
133 (7) STANDARD FORM.—By October 1, 2026, the office shall
134 adopt a standard form, written in plain and simple language,
135 informing a key person that an employer-owned life insurance
136 policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits the
137 employer, and that the key person has the option to reject or
138 opt out of the policy.
139 (8) APPLICABILITY.—
140 (a) This section applies to all new policies issued on or
141 after July 1, 2026.
142 (b) The restrictions on and the prohibitions against
143 employer-owned life insurance policies under subsections (2) and
144 (3), respectively, apply retroactively to existing policies
145 unless the insured employee or the insured employee's family
146 affirmatively opts to maintain the policy and is named as the
147 sole beneficiary, in which case all death benefits shall be paid
148 to the employee's estate or designated family beneficiary.
149 (c) If any provision of this section is in conflict with
150 any other law, the provisions of this section shall govern.
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 261 2026
151 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb261-00